Utah statutes.
16-17-209.   Resignation of registered agent.

(1)  A registered agent may resign at any time with respect to a represented entity by filing with the division a statement of resignation signed by or on behalf of the agent which states:

(a)  the name of the entity;

(b)  the name of the agent;

(c)  that the agent resigns from serving as agent for service of process for the entity; and

(d)  the name and address of the person to which the agent will send the notice required by Subsection (3).

(2)  A statement of resignation takes effect on the earlier of the 31st day after the day on which it is filed or the appointment of a new registered agent for the represented entity.

(3)  The registered agent shall promptly furnish the represented entity notice in a record of the date on which a statement of resignation was filed.

(4)  When a statement of resignation takes effect, the registered agent ceases to have responsibility for any matter tendered to it as agent for the represented entity.  A resignation under this section does not affect any contractual rights the entity has against the agent or that the agent has against the entity.

(5)  A registered agent may resign with respect to a represented entity whether or not the entity is in good standing.



Enacted by Chapter 364, 2008 General Session

